Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2406
Vehicle towed
away; liability for reasonably foreseeable damages.

Anyone
towing away a vehicle
pursuant to sections 60-2401 to 60-2411 shall be liable for any reasonably
foreseeable damages to the vehicle
that occur during the hookup, towing, or disengagement of the vehicle to or from the towing vehicle
and anyone storing such a towed vehicle
shall be liable for any reasonably foreseeable damage to the vehicle and the personal contents therein
during the storage period.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 6.